Maryland, session 2026, HB0432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
5–207.
(a) A municipality may establish and maintain:
(1) a fire department; and
(2) a police force.
(b) A municipality may:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0432*

HOUSE BILL 432
(1) provide for the removal of fire hazards;
(2) control the use and handling of dangerous and explosive materials; and
(3) prevent the discharge of firearms or other explosive instruments.
(c) A municipality may:
(1) pay rewards for information relating to crime committed in the
municipality;
(2) prohibit [vagrancy,] vice, gambling, and houses of prostitution in the
municipality;
(3) enforce all ordinances relating to disorderly conduct and nuisances
equally:
(i) within the municipality; and
(ii) up to one–half mile outside the municipal limits, except where
there is a conflict with the powers of another municipality; and
(4) prohibit minors from being on the streets and in public places at certain
hours of the night.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.